Washington statutes.
RCW 35.64.020

Construction—Collective bargaining agreement not affected.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect any terms, conditions, or practices contained in a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 8, 2000.

[ 2000 c 206 s 2.]